apertium-krl.krl.lexc
LEXICON VERB_RU/VETA

0:ve    VERB_INF_TA ;
0:pie    VERB_INF_MA ;
0:pesi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:pes VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:pie  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:pia  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:vetti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:veta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_KERÄ/TÄ

0    VERB_INF_TÄ ;
0    VERB_INF_MÄ ;
0:si VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ä  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:tti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:tä VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_LEIK/ATA

0:a VERB_INF_TA ;
0:kasi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:kaa  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_ŠAL/VATA

0:va VERB_INF_TA ;
0:pasi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:pua  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:pua  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:pua  VERB_INF_MA ;

LEXICON VERB_VAL/LATA

0:la VERB_INF_TA ;
0:tasi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:taa  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_NIM/ETÄ

0:e VERB_INF_TÄ ;
0:esi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ie  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:et  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_TYK/YTÄ

0:y VERB_INF_TA ;
0:kysi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:kyä  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_HYREYTY/Ä

0      VERB_INF_Ä ;
0      VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0      VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ö      VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:tä      VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_PUREŠKEL/LA

0:l  VERB_INF_A ;
0:i  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:e  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:e  VERB_IMPV ;
0:ti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:e VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0  VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:lu  VERB_PCP_N ;
0:o  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:o  VERB_3SG_U ;

LEXICON VERB_AJAT/ELLA

0:ell  VERB_INF_A ;
0:teli  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:tele  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:tele  VERB_IMPV ;
0:elti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:tele VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:el  VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:ellu  VERB_PCP_N ;
0:telo  VERB_INF_MA ;

LEXICON VERB_KÄŠIT/ELLÄ

0:ell  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:teli  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:tele  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:tele  VERB_IMPV ;
0:elti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:tele VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:el  VERB_PCP_TY ;
0:elly  VERB_PCP_N ;
0:telö VERB_INF_MÄ ;

LEXICON VERB_LEVÄHEL/LÄ

0:l  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:i  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:e  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:e  VERB_IMPV ;
0:ti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:e VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0  VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:ly VERB_PCP_N ;


LEXICON VERB_OM/MELLA

0:mell  VERB_INF_A ;
0:peli  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:pele  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:pele  VERB_IMPV ;
0:melti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:pele VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:mel  VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:mellu  VERB_PCP_N ;


LEXICON ADJ_ERI
!! maybe like fin: eri, no infl.

%<pos%>:0 ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;

LEXICON ADJ_MAINIJO

%<pos%>:0  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:0  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:0  ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:0  ADJ_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON ADJ_TÄRK/IE

%<pos%>:ie  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:ie ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:ie  ADJ_SGPAR_TÄ ;
%<pos%>:ie  ADJ_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
%<comp%>:iemm  ADJ_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
%<sup%>:eimm  ADJ_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON ADJ_OIKIE

%<pos%>:0  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:0  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:0  ADJ_SGPAR_TA ;
%<pos%>:0  ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_PIEN/I

%<pos%>:i ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:e ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<comp%>:empi ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<comp%>:emmä ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<sup%>:in ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;

LEXICON ADJ_NUOR/I

%<pos%>:i  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:e  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:0    ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:0    ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;
%<pos%>:0    ADJ_PLGEN_IEN ;
%<comp%>:empi ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<comp%>:emma ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<sup%>:in ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<sup%>:imma ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<sup%>:imm ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<sup%>:imp ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON ADJ_HYV/Ä

%<pos%>:ä ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:y ADJ_SGPAR_Ä ;
%<pos%>:ä ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON ADJ_PAR/EMPI

%<comp%>:empi  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<comp%>:emp   ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;
%<comp%>:emma  ADJ_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
%<comp%>:empa  ADJ_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
%<comp%>:emn   ADJ_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
%<comp%>:emp   ADJ_CASES_PL_STRONG_BACK ;
%<comp%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:empah # ;
%<sup%>:aš  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<sup%>:aha  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_LÄM/MIN

%<pos%>:min ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:min ADJ_SGPAR_TÄ ;

LEXICON ADJ_IJÄKÄ/Š

%<pos%>:s  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_SGPAR_TÄ ;

LEXICON ADJ_KALLIS

%<pos%>:0  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:0  ADJ_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON ADJ_KAUN/IS

%<pos%>:is  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:ehe  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:is  ADJ_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON ADJ_PAH/A

%<pos%>:a ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:a ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:o   ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:u  ADJ_SGPAR_A ;
%<pos%>:o    ADJ_PLPAR_JA ;
%<comp%>:ampi ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<comp%>:amma  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<comp%>:emma  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<comp%>:amp ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;
%<comp%>:emp ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;
%<comp%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:ampah # ;
%<sup%>:in  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<sup%>:imma  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<sup%>:imm  ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_OM/A

%<pos%>:a ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:a ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:0   ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:u  ADJ_SGPAR_A ;
%<pos%>:0    ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;
%<comp%>:ampi ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<comp%>:amma  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<comp%>:emma  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<comp%>:amp ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;
%<comp%>:emp ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;
%<comp%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:ampah # ;
%<sup%>:in  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<sup%>:imma  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<sup%>:imm  ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_KYPŠ/Ä

%<pos%>:ä  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:y  ADJ_SGPAR_Ä ;
%<pos%>:ä  ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:0    ADJ_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:0    ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON ADJ_YŠTÄVÄLLI/NI

%<pos%>:ni ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:se ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_SGPAR_TU ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON ADJ_KARJALAI/NI

%<pos%>:ni ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:se ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_SGPAR_TA ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON ADJ_EEPPI/NI

%<pos%>:ni ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:se ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_SGPAR_TÄ ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON ADJ_KIELI/NE

%<pos%>:ne ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:se ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_SGPAR_TY ;
%<pos%>:s  ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON ADJ_TUNNET/TU

%<pos%>:tu ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:tu ADJ_PLPAR_JA ;
%<pos%>:u ADJ_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_HELP/PO

%<pos%>:po ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:po ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_AI/TO

%<pos%>:to ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:to ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_UU/ŠI

%<pos%>:ši  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:vve ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:š   ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:š   ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;
%<pos%>:š   ADJ_PLGEN_IEN ;

LEXICON ADJ_TÄY/ŠI

%<pos%>:ši  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:ve ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON ADJ_VALME/Š

%<pos%>:š    ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:he  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:h   ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:h   ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON ADJ_KIRK/AŠ

%<pos%>:aš    ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:kaha  ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:kah   ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK ;
%<pos%>:kah   ADJ_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON ADJ_ERÄ/S

%<pos%>:s  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:hä ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT ;


LEXICON PROPN_PETROSKOI

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_PIITERI

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_LÖNNROT

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_KARHUMÄ/KI

0:ki PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:je PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_JYŠKYJÄRV/I

0:i PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_KYLLIK/KI

0:ki PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_LEMMINKÄI/NI

0:ni PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_ILMARI/NI

0:ni PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  PROPN_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON PROPN_JOUKAHAI/NE

0:ne PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  PROPN_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON PROPN_LOUH/I

0:i PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0  PROPN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0  PROPN_PLPAR_IE ;
0  PROPN_PLGEN_IEN ;

LEXICON PROPN_VENÄJÄ

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_PITKÄRAN/TA

0:ta PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:na PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_KARJALA

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_ANN/A

0:a PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u PROPN_SGPAR_A ;

LEXICON PROPN_VLASOV/A

0:a PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u PROPN_SGPAR_A ;

LEXICON PROPN_MORDOUVI/A

0:a PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_UDMURTIJ/A

0:a PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;


LEXICON PROPN_TORVI/NEN

0:nen PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ
aito%<adj%>:ai  ADJ_AI/TO ;
helppo%<adj%>:help  ADJ_HELP/PO ;
eri%<adj%>:eri ADJ_ERI ;
erikoine%<adj%>:erikoi ADJ_KIELI/NE ;
erilaini%<adj%>:erilai ADJ_KARJALAI/NI ;
eryäs%<adj%>:eryä ADJ_ERÄ/S ;
eräs%<adj%>:erä ADJ_ERÄ/S ;
henkellini%<adj%>:henkelli ADJ_EEPPI/NI ;
hieno%<adj%>:hieno  ADJ_MAINIJO ;
hyvä%<adj%>:hyv ADJ_HYV/Ä ;
hyvä%<adj%>:par  ADJ_PAR/EMPI ;
ijäkäš%<adj%>:ijäkä  ADJ_IJÄKÄ/Š ;
ikäne%<adj%>:ikä ADJ_KIELI/NE ;
kallis%<adj%>:kallis ADJ_KALLIS ;
kaunis%<adj%>:kaun ADJ_KAUN/IS ;
kuulusa%<adj%>:kuulus ADJ_OM/A ;
kypšä%<adj%>:kyps ADJ_KYPŠ/Ä ;
liettualaini%<adj%>:liettualai ADJ_KARJALAI/NI ;
lämmin%<adj%>:läm ADJ_LÄM/MIN ;
mahtava%<adj%>:mahtav ADJ_OM/A ;
mainijo%<adj%>:mainijo  ADJ_MAINIJO ;
mehövä%<adj%>:mehöv ADJ_KYPŠ/Ä ;
melukaš%<adj%>:meluk ADJ_KIRK/AŠ ;
miellyttävä%<adj%>:miellyttäv ADJ_KYPŠ/Ä ;
nerokaš%<adj%>:nerok ADJ_KIRK/AŠ ;
nuori%<adj%>:nuor ADJ_NUOR/I ;
oikie%<adj%>:oikie ADJ_OIKIE ;
varma%<adj%>:varm ADJ_PAH/A ;
permin#kieline%<adj%>:permin0kieli ADJ_KIELI/NE ;
pieni%<adj%>:pien ADJ_PIEN/I ;
rušappo%<adj%>:rušappo ADJ_MAINIJO ;
šama%<adj%>:šam ADJ_PAH/A ;
šamanmielini%<adj%>:šamanmieli ADJ_EEPPI/NI ;
šelvä%<adj%>:šelv ADJ_HYV/Ä ;
šilie%<adj%>:šilie ADJ_OIKIE ;
suomelane%<adj%>:suomela ADJ_KARJALAI/NI ;
šuosittu%<adj%>:šuosit  ADJ_TUNNET/TU ;
šuuri%<adj%>:šuur ADJ_NUOR/I ;
tarkka%<adj%>:tarkk ADJ_PAH/A ;
tarvittava%<adj%>:tarvittav ADJ_OM/A ;
tunnettu%<adj%>:tunnet  ADJ_TUNNET/TU ;
tyhjä%<adj%>:tyhj ADJ_HYV/Ä ;
tärkie%<adj%>:tärk ADJ_TÄRK/IE ;
täyši%<adj%>:täy  ADJ_TÄY/ŠI ;
uuši%<adj%>:uu  ADJ_UU/ŠI ;
vakallini%<adj%>:vakalli ADJ_YŠTÄVÄLLI/NI ;
valkie%<adj%>:valkie ADJ_OIKIE ;
venäläini%<adj%>:venäläi  ADJ_YŠTÄVÄLLI/NI ;
šiännöllini%<adj%>:šiännölli  ADJ_EEPPI/NI ;
valmeš%<adj%>:valme ADJ_VALME/Š ;
LEXICON PROPN
Anna%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Ann PROPN_ANN/A ;
Šuomi%<np%>%<top%>:Šuom  PROPN_LOUH/I ;
Vestaskonserni%<np%>%<al%>:Vestaskonsern  PROPN_LOUH/I ;
Eiffel%<np%>%<top%>:Eiffel PROPN_LÖNNROT ;
Ilmarini%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Ilmari  PROPN_ILMARI/NI ;
Jakutija%<np%>%<top%>:Jakutij  PROPN_UDMURTIJ/A ;
Joukahaine%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Joukahai  PROPN_JOUKAHAI/NE ;
Jyškyjärvi%<np%>%<top%>:Jyškyjärv PROPN_JYŠKYJÄRV/I ;
Kira%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Kira PROPN_KARJALA ;
Kirilä%<np%>%<cog%>:Kirilä PROPN_VENÄJÄ ;
Kiži%<np%>%<top%>:Kiži PROPN_PETROSKOI ;
Kyllikki%<np%>%<ant%>:Kyllik PROPN_KYLLIK/KI ;
Lemminkäini%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Lemminkäi  PROPN_LEMMINKÄI/NI ;
Lönnrot%<np%>%<cog%>:Lönnrot PROPN_LÖNNROT ;
Mordouvia%<np%>%<top%>:Mordouvi  PROPN_MORDOUVI/A ;
Nadežda%<np%>%<ant%>:Nadežd  PROPN_MORDOUVI/A ;
Nina%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Nina PROPN_KARJALA ;
Petri%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Petri PROPN_PETROSKOI ;
Piiteri%<np%>%<top%>:Piiteri PROPN_PIITERI ;
Pitkäranta%<np%>%<cog%>:Pitkäran PROPN_PITKÄRAN/TA ;
Šeina%<np%>%<cog%>:Šein  PROPN_VLASOV/A ;
State%<np%>%<top%>:State PROPN_VENÄJÄ ;
Torvinen%<np%>%<cog%>:Torvi PROPN_TORVI/NEN ;
Udmurtija%<np%>%<top%>:Udmurtij  PROPN_UDMURTIJ/A ;
Viipuni%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Viipu  PROPN_ILMARI/NI ;
Vlasova%<np%>%<cog%>:Vlasov  PROPN_VLASOV/A ;
Vuokkiniemi%<np%>%<top%>:Vuokkiniem PROPN_JYŠKYJÄRV/I ;
Väinämöini%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Väinämöi  PROPN_LEMMINKÄI/NI ;
Karhumäki%<np%>%<top%>:Karhumä PROPN_KARHUMÄ/KI ;
LEXICON VERB
šuunnitella%<vblex%>:šuunnit    VERB_AJAT/ELLA ;
järještyä%<vblex%>:järješty  VERB_HYREYTY/Ä ;
kehittyä%<vblex%>:kehitty VERB_HYREYTY/Ä ;
kerätä%<vblex%>:kerä VERB_KERÄ/TÄ ;
kuotella%<vblex%>:kuot    VERB_AJAT/ELLA ;
kuvitella%<vblex%>:kuvit    VERB_AJAT/ELLA ;
kyšyä%<vblex%>:kyšy  VERB_HYREYTY/Ä ;
käšitellä%<vblex%>:käšit  VERB_KÄŠIT/ELLÄ ;
käsitellä%<vblex%>:käsit  VERB_KÄŠIT/ELLÄ ;
leikata%<vblex%>:leik  VERB_LEIK/ATA ;
levähellä%<vblex%>:levähel  VERB_LEVÄHEL/LÄ ;
nimetä%<vblex%>:nim VERB_NIM/ETÄ ;
ommella%<vblex%>:om  VERB_OM/MELLA ;
pureškella%<vblex%>:pureškel  VERB_PUREŠKEL/LA ;
ruveta%<vblex%>:ru  VERB_RU/VETA ;
šalvata%<vblex%>:šal  VERB_ŠAL/VATA ;
luvata%<vblex%>:lu  VERB_ŠAL/VATA ;
šuojella%<vblex%>:šuojel  VERB_PUREŠKEL/LA ;
tykytä%<vblex%>:tyk VERB_TYK/YTÄ ;
vaihella%<vblex%>:vaihel  VERB_PUREŠKEL/LA ;
vallata%<vblex%>:val VERB_VAL/LATA ;
